Massachusetts, session 194th, H2492.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 111 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is hereby
amended by inserting the following new section:-
Section 245. Any hospital or medical facility in the Commonwealth shall require that a
patient has secured suitable transport from the hospital before discharge, provided that the patient
meets the following criteria:
(a.) The patient had a surgery that required anesthesia.
(b.) The patient qualifies as a person with a developmental disability as defined in 115
CMR 2.01 or in 118 CMR 2.02.
(c.) The patient is in the hospital for substance abuse treatment.
(d.) The patient suffers from Alzheimer’s disease or dementia.
of 2

This section shall not be construed to mean that a hospital and medical facility has a legal
duty to provide or secure transport for patients covered by this section.
of 2